lexc/adj/enhuadjigem.lexc
LEXICON Possmboe
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§oeoeadjoe§m   Famboe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§oeoeadjoe§d   Famboe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§oeoeadjoe§t§oeoeadjoe§k   Famboe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboe11;

LEXICON Plurmboe
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genboe; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Genboe; 
                       Genboe11;


LEXICON Famboe11
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genboe;
                       Genboe11;
LEXICON Genboe11
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseboe;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseboe;
                       Caseboe11;

LEXICON Caseboe11
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez4a§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                            Ik;

Lexicon Ik
+Ik:^ik     Possik;
+Ik:^ik     Plurik;
+Ik:^ik     Famik;
            #;

LEXICON Possik
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE4a§m   Famik;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE4a§d   Famik;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AE1§   Famik;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famik;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE4a§t§OEOE§k   Famik;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Famik;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famik;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famik;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famik;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famik;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famik;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famik;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famik;
LEXICON Plurik
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1e§k    Genik;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11e§k    Genik;
                            Genik;

LEXICON Famik
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genik;
                       Genik;

LEXICON Genik
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseik;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseik;
                       Caseik;
  
LEXICON Caseik
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoezmid§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddAdjboeaejaje
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboeaejaje;

Lexicon Tocaseboeaejaje
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboeaejaje;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboe;

LEXICON Possboeaejaje
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l     #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famboe;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famboe;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§JJ§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§Jnull§§AE1§   Famboe;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famboe;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famboe;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Famboe;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Famboe;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Famboe;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Famboe;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Famboe;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famboe;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Famboe;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famboe;

LEXICON AddAdjboeaejajeet
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1boe;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocaseboeaejajeet;

Lexicon Tocaseboeaejajeet
[stem]+Adj:0     Possboeaejajeet;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurboe;
[stem]+Adj:0     Famboe;

LEXICON Adj
adatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
agnoszkált AddAdjboeaejaje;
aktualizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
analizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
archivált AddAdjboeaejaje;
asszociált AddAdjboeaejaje;
babrált AddAdjboeaejaje;
becsült AddAdjboeaejaje;
bilincselt AddAdjboeaejaje;
blokkolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
borult AddAdjboeaejaje;
burkolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
békült AddAdjboeaejaje;
bírált AddAdjboeaejaje;
bűvölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
cipelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
csalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
csatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
csinált AddAdjboeaejaje;
csonkolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
csókolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
dajkált AddAdjboeaejaje;
darált AddAdjboeaejaje;
definiált AddAdjboeaejaje;
deklarált AddAdjboeaejaje;
demonstrált AddAdjboeaejaje;
determinált AddAdjboeaejaje;
dializált AddAdjboeaejaje;
diszkriminált AddAdjboeaejaje;
domesztikált AddAdjboeaejaje;
dumált AddAdjboeaejaje;
dúcolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
egyelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
engesztelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
esztergált AddAdjboeaejaje;
fakadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
fejelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
filozofált AddAdjboeaejaje;
foglalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
fontolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
forradt AddAdjboeaejaje;
frakcionált AddAdjboeaejaje;
funkcionált AddAdjboeaejaje;
fésült AddAdjboeaejaje;
füstölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
gombolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
gusztált AddAdjboeaejaje;
gyilkolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
gyúlt AddAdjboeaejaje;
gátolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
göngyölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
halt AddAdjboeaejaje;
hantolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
hanyagolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
hatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
határolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
hazudtolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
hibridizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
honorált AddAdjboeaejaje;
humorizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
hálált AddAdjboeaejaje;
hántolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
híresült AddAdjboeaejaje;     
hőszigetelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
ideologizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
indokolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
integrált AddAdjboeaejaje;
ismételt AddAdjboeaejaje;
javallt AddAdjboeaejaje;
jósolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kalkulált AddAdjboeaejaje;
karcolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
katalizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
kegyelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
került AddAdjboeaejaje;
kifogásolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kombinált AddAdjboeaejaje;
komplikált AddAdjboeaejaje;
kondicionált AddAdjboeaejaje;
konfrontált AddAdjboeaejaje;
konsternált AddAdjboeaejaje;
kontrollált AddAdjboeaejaje;
koplalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
korlátolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
korrigált AddAdjboeaejaje;
kosztolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
kovácsolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kushadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kárpótolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
kártolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
képelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kínált AddAdjboeaejaje;
kódolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
kóstolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
követelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
különült AddAdjboeaejaje;
lapátolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
latolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
legalizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
lektorált AddAdjboeaejaje;
licitált AddAdjboeaejaje;
lokalizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
lyukadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
magolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
markolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
maszatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
meditált AddAdjboeaejaje;
merült AddAdjboeaejaje;
mobilizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
moderált AddAdjboeaejaje;
moralizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
mozdult AddAdjboeaejaje;
muzsikált AddAdjboeaejaje;
méltányolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
módosult AddAdjboeaejaje;
nagyolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
negált AddAdjboeaejaje;
normált AddAdjboeaejaje;
nyelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
nyuvadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
okadatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
okult AddAdjboeaejaje;
orientált AddAdjboeaejaje;
ottmaradt AddAdjboeaejaje;
pakolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
palástolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
parancsolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
pasztörizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
perelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
pipált AddAdjboeaejaje;
pletykált AddAdjboeaejaje;
polgárosult AddAdjboeaejaje;
poshadt AddAdjboeaejaje;     
prognosztizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
próbált AddAdjboeaejaje;
puhatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
purgált AddAdjboeaejaje;
pártolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
pótolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
pörkölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
racionalizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
rajtolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
reagált AddAdjboeaejaje;
reflektált AddAdjboeaejaje;
rehabilitált AddAdjboeaejaje;
rendült AddAdjboeaejaje;
repült AddAdjboeaejaje;
rezdült AddAdjboeaejaje;
romolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
rostált AddAdjboeaejaje;
rovatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
rándult AddAdjboeaejaje;
röpült AddAdjboeaejaje;
sarkalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
sikerült AddAdjboeaejaje;
sminkelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
sportolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
spórolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
stilizált AddAdjboeaejaje;
suvadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szagolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szegelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szeparált AddAdjboeaejaje;
szikkadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szimatolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
szolgált AddAdjboeaejaje;
szállt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szándékolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szégyenelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szólalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
szökdécselt AddAdjboeaejaje;
sétált AddAdjboeaejaje;
talált AddAdjboeaejaje;
telefonált AddAdjboeaejaje;
terelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tervelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tikkadt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tisztelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
toldalékolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tolt AddAdjboeaejajeet;
torkolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tréfált AddAdjboeaejaje;
táncolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
tárult AddAdjboeaejaje;
tökölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
udvarolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
uralt AddAdjboeaejaje;
vagdalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
varázsolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
vetemült AddAdjboeaejaje;
viaszolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
virult AddAdjboeaejaje;
vonult AddAdjboeaejaje;
vállalt AddAdjboeaejaje;
vásárolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
zsigerelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
áramolt AddAdjboeaejaje;
érzékelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
ölelt AddAdjboeaejaje;
őrölt AddAdjboeaejaje;
